Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 24 Governmental Reorganization and Termination From Employment Reform

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1855, § 1, effective July 1, 1995, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter. The former chapter consisted of Code Sections

45-24-1

through

45-24-9

, relating to family leave, and was based on Code 1981, §§

45-24-1

through

45-24-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1855, § 1.

45-24-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Governmental Reorganization and Termination from Employment Reform Act of 1997.”

History.

Code 1981, §

45-24-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1528, § 1.

45-24-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Commission” means the State Personnel Oversight Commission.

“Employer” means an employing unit within the government of the State of Georgia, including every department, commission, board, bureau, agency, branch of government, or any other employing unit by whatever name called, which has the authority and power to appoint, employ, release, separate, or fail to reappoint public officers or employees.

“Involuntary separation” means the release or separation from state service of an officer or employee who is entitled to coverage under the involuntary separation retirement benefits provisions of Code Section 47-2-123.

“State department” means a unit of state government which is a budget unit in the General Appropriations Act.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-24-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1528, § 1.

45-24-3.
State Personnel Oversight Commission.

There is created the State Personnel Oversight Commission to be composed of three members appointed by the President of the Senate, three members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and three members appointed by the Governor. The Governor shall appoint one of the Governor’s appointees as chairperson. Five members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. None of the members shall be officers or employees of the state. The President of the Senate shall designate one of such officer’s initial appointees to serve an initial term of one year, one of such officer’s initial appointees to serve an initial term of three years, and one of such officer’s initial appointees to serve an initial term of five years. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one of such officer’s initial appointees to serve an initial term of two years, one of such officer’s initial appointees to serve an initial term of four years, and one of such officer’s initial appointees to serve an initial term of five years. The Governor shall appoint one of such officer’s initial appointees to serve an initial term of one year, one of such officer’s initial appointees to serve an initial term of two years, and one of such officer’s initial appointees to serve an initial term of three years. After the expiration of such initial terms of office, successors to members of the commission whose initial terms of office expire and all future successors to members of the commission whose terms of office expire shall be appointed by the person occupying the office which made the original appointment and shall serve for a term of five years and until the appointment and qualification of their respective successors. Vacancies on the commission, except those caused by expiration of term, shall be filled by the appointment of a replacement member by the person occupying the office which made the appointment to the membership position on the commission which became vacant, and the person so appointed shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term and until the appointment and qualification of a successor.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation but shall receive the allowances authorized for legislative members of interim legislative committees. The Governor’s office shall maintain the names and addresses of the members of the commission as a matter of public record. The Georgia Building Authority shall make available to the commission such meeting facilities as the chairperson may request. The commission shall be assigned to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for administrative purposes only, as defined in Code Section 50-4-3.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-24-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1528, § 1.

45-24-4.
Commission to approve involuntary separation; compliance with Code Section 45-24-8 required for reorganization.

From and after July 1, 1997, no employer shall cause the involuntary separation of a state officer or employee without the prior approval of the commission. An employer may proceed with a reorganization which might result in such involuntary separation without prior approval of the commission upon compliance with Code Section 45-24-8.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-24-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1528, § 1.

45-24-5.
Notice to commission prior to involuntary separation.

An employer contemplating the involuntary separation from state service of an officer or employee shall notify the chairperson of the commission at least 90 but not more than 120 days prior to the proposed date of the separation. Pending the completion of such procedures, the employee or officer proposed for termination shall be compensated from any funds appropriated or available to the employer which may be used for such purpose. The notice shall be in writing and shall include the following information:

The name and current annual compensation of the officer or employee proposed for involuntary separation;

The age, length of service, current job description, and summary of the work experience of the officer or employee proposed for involuntary separation;

The educational qualifications of the officer or employee proposed for involuntary separation; and

An explanation of the reasons for the proposed involuntary separation of the officer or employee.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-24-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1528, § 1.

45-24-6.
Notice to chief executive officer of state departments; response required; proceedings when continued employment available; review of termination or separation.

The commission shall provide written notice of each contemplated involuntary separation to each chief executive officer of each state department, which notice shall contain the information required in the notice to the commission under Code Section 45-24-5 and be provided at least 60 days prior to the effective date of the contemplated involuntary separation. Within 21 days after such notice is sent by first-class mail, each such department chief executive officer shall provide a written response to the commission regarding whether or not such department has available any position of continued employment for that official or employee proposed for termination from employment which may meet the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-24-8. A failure of a department chief executive officer to provide a written response in accordance with the provisions of this subsection shall result in that chief executive officer’s department becoming ineligible to have any increase in the number of employees in such department for the next two fiscal years, shall authorize the commission to require that chief executive officer to appear and testify before any meeting of the commission scheduled in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, and shall also authorize the commission to obtain a writ of mandamus against such chief executive officer to compel the performance of any duties imposed by this subsection upon such officer.

If any response provided under subsection (a) of this Code section shows the availability of continued employment, the commission shall meet within 14 days after the response deadline to determine whether the continued employment indicated in any response meets the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-24-8. If the commission determines such response meets those requirements, it shall offer continued employment in that position to the officer or employee on whose behalf the response was obtained; otherwise, the commission shall proceed as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section. Any official or employee who is thus offered a position of continued employment shall be deemed to have resigned from service at his or her own choice upon that person’s failure to accept the position of continued employment, and no such official or employee so resigning from service shall qualify for retirement benefits based upon involuntary separation from employment without prejudice.

If none of the responses obtained from department chief executives under subsection (a) of this Code section shows availability of continued employment meeting the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-24-8, the commission chairperson shall schedule a meeting of the commission to review the release or separation. Five members of the commission shall be a quorum. At the meeting, the employer shall have the burden of convincing the commission that the involuntary separation is necessary, justified, and in the best interests of the state. The commission may request as much information and may meet as many times on each case as it deems necessary to reach an informed decision. No action shall be taken on the separation of the officer or employee until the commission makes a final determination as to whether the separation is necessary, justified, and in the best interests of the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-24-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1528, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 45.

45-24-7.
Authorization to proceed with separation.

If the commission by majority vote of those members present approves the involuntary separation, the employer is authorized, but not required, to proceed with the separation. If the employer proceeds with such separation, the employer shall not be eligible to have any increase in the number of employees in that employing unit for the next two fiscal years. If the commission rejects the involuntary separation, the employee shall not be separated, shall continue to be employed and compensated by the employer, and shall not be the subject of a proposed involuntary separation more than once every two years. As used in this Code section, the term “number of employees” means the total number of employees immediately prior to the involuntary separation, not counting any employee to be involuntarily separated.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-24-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1528, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “Code section” was substituted for “subsection” in the last sentence.

45-24-8.
Proceedings for reorganization.

No employer shall institute a reorganization of that employer or any component thereof if the reorganization will result in the involuntary separation of any official or employee thereof who is eligible for involuntary separation unless, prior to that reorganization becoming effective, that employer effects a transfer of each such official or employee to another component of the employer not subject to such reorganization or obtains a transfer of each such official or employee to another employer, which transfer shall meet the following requirements:

The annual compensation for the new employment position is the same or greater than the current annual compensation of the official or employee being transferred;

The duties and responsibilities for such position shall be reasonably compatible with the previous work experience and educational qualifications of the official or employee being transferred and the availability of an unclassified position for a person in a classified position shall be deemed a comparable position if the duties, responsibilities, and compensation of the unclassified position are otherwise comparable to the classified position; and

The position is one which includes the holder thereof as a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

An official or employee transferred to an employer pursuant to this Code section shall be deemed to have resigned from service at his or her own choice upon the failure of such person to accept the transfer and shall therefor not qualify for retirement benefits based upon involuntary separation from employment without prejudice.

A reorganization by an employer in violation of this Code section is void, and no official or employee shall be separated from employment as a result of such void reorganization, whether or not that person is eligible for involuntary separation.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-24-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1528, § 1.

45-24-9.
Notice of involuntary separation; taxpayers’ pension advocate; providing briefs; attendance at commission meetings.

When the commission is notified of a contemplated involuntary separation as provided in Code Section 45-24-5, the commission shall immediately notify the Attorney General and shall provide the Attorney General with all information and documentation concerning the matter as the commission has been provided or is subsequently provided.

Immediately upon being notified of a contemplated involuntary separation as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the Attorney General shall appoint an attorney on his or her staff to act as the taxpayers’ pension advocate in the matter. Such attorney shall not be the attorney assigned to advise the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. It shall be the duty of the taxpayers’ pension advocate to review all aspects of the termination of the employee and the application for involuntary separation retirement benefits and to raise all possible objections, both factual and legal, to the employee’s being granted such benefits. All state agencies shall cooperate with the taxpayers’ pension advocate and shall provide him or her with nonprivileged information upon request.

As soon as practicable but not later than the date scheduled for the meeting of the commission provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 45-24-6, the taxpayers’ pension advocate shall prepare a brief of fact and law and shall raise all objections to the involuntary separation of the employee or to the granting of involuntary separation retirement benefits to the employee. The taxpayers’ pension advocate shall provide a copy of such brief to each member of the commission and to each member of the Senate Retirement Committee and the House Committee on Retirement.

The taxpayers’ pension advocate shall attend each meeting of the commission held pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 45-24-6 and shall make oral arguments before the commission supporting the brief prepared pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-24-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1363, § 1.